Louisiana, session 2026, HB531.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 17:416(C)(4) and (5)(a) are hereby amended and reenacted to read
as follows:
§416. Discipline of students; suspension; expulsion
* * *
C.
* * *
(4) The parent or legal guardian of the student who has been recommended
for expulsion pursuant to this Section may, within five days after the decision is
rendered, submit a request to the city, parish, or other local public school board to
review the findings of the superintendent or his designee at a time set by the school
board; otherwise the decision of the superintendent shall be final. If requested as
provided in this Paragraph, and after reviewing the findings of the superintendent or
his designee, the school board may affirm, modify, or reverse the action previously
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1144 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 531
taken. The parent or legal guardian of the student shall not have such right of review
even if the recommendation for expulsion is reduced to a short-term or long-term
suspension. Each school board's code of conduct shall include information detailing
the appeal process provided in this Paragraph and Subparagraph (5)(a) of this
Subsection.
(5)(a) The parent or legal guardian of the student who has been
recommended for expulsion pursuant to this Section may, within ten school days,
appeal to the district court for the parish in which the student's school is located, an
adverse ruling of the school board in upholding the action of the superintendent or
his designee. The court may reverse or revise the ruling of the school board upon a
finding that the ruling of the board was based on an absence of any relevant evidence
in support thereof. The parent or legal guardian of the student shall not have such
right to appeal to the district court even if the recommendation for expulsion is
reduced to a short-term or long-term suspension.
* * *
Section 2. R.S. 17:416(C)(2)(c) is hereby repealed in its entirety.